Maryland, session 2025, SB0230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
3–602.
(a) [At least once every 3 years, the] THE Office of the Inspector General in the
Department shall[:
(1) conduct or contract for a financial and compliance audit of each local
department; and
(2) prepare a written report of the audit findings] CONDUCT OR
CONTRACT FOR A FINANCIAL AND COMPLIANCE AUDIT OF EACH LOCAL
DEPARTMENT AT AN INTERVAL RANGING FROM 3 TO OF 4 YEARS UNLESS THE
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL DETERMINES, ON A CASE–BY–CASE BASIS,
THAT MORE FREQUENT AUDITS ARE REQUIRED AN AUDIT OCCUR AT AN INTERVAL
OF 3 YEARS.
(B) IN DETERMINING THE AUDIT INTERVAL FOR A LOCAL DEPARTMENT,
THE OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL SHALL TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION:
(1) THE MATERIALITY AND RISK PROFILE OF THE LOCAL
DEPARTMENT’S PROGRAMS AND FISCAL ACTIVITIES;
– 1 –

Ch. 418 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE NATURE AND EXTENT OF PRIOR AUDIT FINDINGS OF THE
LOCAL DEPARTMENT; AND
(3) ANY OTHER FACTOR RELATED TO RISK.
[(b)] (C) The audit shall comply with the auditing standards issued by the
Institute of Internal Auditors.
[(c)] (D) [The] A written report of the audit findings shall be PREPARED AND
distributed to:
(1) the local board; and
(2) the local governing authority.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –